California statutes. Insurance Code
The commissioner shall publish such application for withdrawal, daily, for one week, in each of two daily newspapers of general circulation, one published in the city of San Francisco, and the other in the city of Sacramento. The expense of such publication shall be paid in advance by the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1071.5.

Every insurer which withdraws as an insurer, or is required to withdraw as an insurer, from this State shall, prior to such withdrawal, discharge its liabilities to residents of this State. In the case of its policies insuring residents of this State it shall cause the primary liabilities under such policies to be reinsured and assumed by another admitted insurer. In the case of such policies as are subject to cancellation by the insurer, it may cancel such policies pursuant to the terms thereof in lieu of such reinsurance and assumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------

1072.

The commissioner shall make, or cause to be made by the insurance authority of the State where the insurer is organized, an examination of the books and records of the insurer. If, upon such examination, he finds that the insurer has no outstanding liabilities to residents of this State and no policies in favor of the residents of this State uncanceled or the primary liabilities under which have not been reinsured and assumed by another admitted insurer, as required by Section 1071.5, he shall cancel the insurer’s certificates of authority, if unexpired, and he shall permit the insurer to withdraw. The commissioner may, in his discretion, waive any or all of the above requirements if, after such examination, he finds it to be in a solvent condition. The cost and expense of all such examinations shall be paid as prescribed in Section 736.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

1073.

Whenever any insurer withdraws from business in this State, and whenever for any reason the commissioner revokes or cancels the certificate of authority admitting any insurer, the commissioner shall thereafter cause a notice of the revocation, cancellation or withdrawal to be published in one daily newspaper published in the city of San Francisco and one daily newspaper published in the city of Los Angeles. The expense of such publication shall be paid by the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1074.

Upon the failure of such insurer to pay the expense of such advertising within thirty days after the presentation of the bill therefor, the commissioner shall collect such fee from the surety in the bond furnished in accordance with the provisions of Article 12 of this chapter or out of securities furnished thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1076.

The withdrawing insurer shall pay to the commissioner a fee of one thousand four hundred ten dollars ($1,410) for all services and expenses in connection with the withdrawal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 19.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15.5. Administrative Supervision [1077. - 1077.95.]

1077.

As used in this article:

(a) “Insurer” means and includes every person engaged as indemnitor, surety, or contractor in the business of entering into contracts of life or disability insurance or of annuities. 

(b) “Exceeded its powers” means any of the following conditions: 

(1) The insurer has refused to permit examination of its books, papers, accounts, records, or affairs by the commissioner, his or her deputies, employees, or duly commissioned examiners. 

(2) A domestic insurer has unlawfully removed from this state books, papers, accounts, or records necessary for an examination of the insurer. 

(3) The insurer has failed to promptly comply with the applicable financial reporting statutes or rules and departmental requests relating thereto. 

(4) The insurer has neglected or refused to observe an order of the commissioner to make good, within the time prescribed by law, any prohibited deficiency in its capital, capital stock, or surplus. 

(5) The insurer is continuing to transact insurance or write business after its license has been revoked or suspended by the commissioner. 

(6) The insurer, by contract or otherwise, has unlawfully, or has in violation of an order of the commissioner, or has without first having obtained written approval of the commissioner, if approval is required by law, done any of the following: 

(A) Totally reinsured its entire outstanding business. 

(B) Merged or consolidated substantially its entire property or business with another insurer. 

(7) The insurer engaged in any transaction in which it is not authorized to engage under the laws of this state. 

(8) The insurer refused to comply with a lawful order of the commissioner. 

(c) “Consent” means agreement to administrative supervision by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.1.

The provisions of the article shall apply to all of the following:

(a) All domestic life or disability insurers, except the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(b) Any other life or disability insurer doing business in this state whose state of domicile has asked the commissioner to apply the provisions of this article as regards that insurer.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the State Compensation Insurance Fund may give its consent to administrative supervision pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1077.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 4.6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.2.

(a) An insurer may be subject to administrative supervision by the commissioner if, upon examination or at any other time it appears in the commissioner’s discretion that any of the following applies: 

(1) The insurer’s condition renders the continuance of its business hazardous to the public or to its insureds. 

(2) The insurer appears to have exceeded its powers granted under its certificate of authority and applicable law. 

(3) The insurer has failed to comply with the applicable provisions of the Insurance Code. 

(4) The business of the insurer is being conducted fraudulently. 

(5) The insurer gives its consent. 

(b) If the commissioner determines that the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) exist, the commissioner shall do all of the following: 

(1) Notify the insurer of his or her determination.

(2) Furnish to the insurer a written list of the requirements to abate this determination. 

(3) Notify the insurer that it is under the supervision of the commissioner and that the commissioner is applying and effectuating the provisions of the article. The action by the commissioner shall be subject to review pursuant to Section 12940. 

(c) If placed under administrative supervision, the insurer shall have 60 days, or another period of time as designated by the commissioner, to comply with the requirements of the commissioner subject to the provisions of this article. 

(d) If it is determined after notice and hearing that the conditions giving rise to the supervision still exist at the end of the supervision period specified above, the commissioner may extend the period. 

(e) If it is determined that none of the conditions giving rise to the supervision exist, the commissioner shall release the insurer from supervision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as set forth in this section, proceedings, hearings, notices, correspondence, reports, records, and other information in the possession of the commissioner or the department relating to the supervision of any insurer are confidential except as provided by this section. 

(b) The personnel of the department shall have access to these proceedings, hearings, notices, correspondence, reports, records, or information as permitted by the commissioner. 

(c) The commissioner may open the proceedings or hearings or disclose the notices, correspondence, reports, records, or information to a department, agency, or instrumentality of this or another state of the United States if the commissioner determines that the disclosure is necessary or proper for the enforcement of the laws of this or another state of the United States. 

(d) The commissioner may open the proceedings or hearings or make public the notices, correspondence, reports, records, or other information if the commissioner deems that it is in the best interest of the public or in the best interest of the insurer, its insureds, creditors, or the general public. 

(e) This section does not apply to hearings, notices, correspondence, reports, records, or other information obtained upon the appointment of a receiver for the insurer by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.4.

During the period of supervision, the commissioner or his or her designated appointee shall serve as the administrative supervisor. The commissioner may provide that the insurer may not do any of the following things during the period of supervision, without the prior approval of the commissioner or his or her appointed supervisor:

(a) Dispose of, convey, or encumber any of its assets or its business in force. 

(b) Withdraw any of its bank accounts. 

(c) Lend any of its funds. 

(d) Invest any of its funds. 

(e) Transfer any of its property. 

(f) Incur any debt, obligation, or liability. 

(g) Merge or consolidate with another company. 

(h) Approve new premiums or renew any policies. 

(i) Enter into any new reinsurance contract or treaty. 

(j) Terminate, surrender, forfeit, convert, or lapse any insurance policy, certificate, or contract, except for nonpayment of premiums due. 

(k) Release, pay, or refund premium deposits, accrued cash, or loan values, unearned premiums, or other reserves on any insurance policy, certificate, or contract. 

(l) Make any material change in management. 

(m) Increase salaries and benefits of officers or directors or the preferential payment of bonuses, dividends, or other payments deemed preferential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.5.

During the period of supervision the insurer may contest an action taken or proposed to be taken by the supervisor specifying the manner wherein the action being complained of would not result in improving the condition of the insurer by requesting reconsideration by the commissioner. Denial of the insurer’s request upon reconsideration entitles the insurer to seek judicial review under Section 12940.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.6.

Nothing contained in this article shall preclude the commissioner from initiating judicial proceedings to place an insurer in conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation proceedings or other delinquency proceedings, however designated under the laws of this state, regardless of whether the commissioner has previously initiated administrative supervision proceedings under this article against the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.7.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules necessary for the implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner may meet with a supervisor appointed under this article and with the attorney or other representative of the supervisor, without the presence of any other person, at the time of any proceedings or during the pendency of any proceeding held under authority of this article to carry out the commissioner’s duties under this article or for the supervisor to carry out his or her duties under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.9.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the commissioner or the department or its employees or agents for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.95.

The authority granted pursuant to this article is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Approval of Reinsurance Plans [1080. - 1091.]

1080.

Any domestic incorporated mutual life insurer or disability insurer or life and disability insurer issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis may merge, consolidate or otherwise unite with or become a part of, or may reinsure all of its policies with, and, upon the assumption of all of its liabilities, may transfer its assets to, any incorporated mutual insurer admitted to transact the business of life, disability or life and disability insurance in this State. The plan and agreement by which any such transaction is to be effected shall be submitted to the commissioner who shall examine the same and may require such provisions to be inserted in the agreement and such actions to be taken in connection with the transaction as he may deem necessary in order that the transaction shall be mutually fair and equitable between the respective members and policyholders of the companies parties to the transaction.

When any such plan and agreement shall have been approved by the commissioner the same shall be approved in the case of each domestic insurer party to the merger or consolidation or the reinsuring of its policies and transferring of its assets by two-thirds of the votes cast by the members thereof represented in person or by proxy at a meeting called to consider the same. Notice of said meeting and its purpose shall be given by mail at least 30 days before the day fixed for the meeting to members whose insurance shall have been in force for at least one year prior to such meeting, at their addresses appearing on the books maintained at the home office of the company. With respect to those members whose addresses do not appear on such books of the company notice shall be deemed to have been given if published at least once in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the company is located. At such meeting the presence in person or by proxy of 5 percent of such members of such insurer shall constitute a quorum. In the absence of a quorum the members present at the meeting in person or by proxy may adjourn the meeting to a later date. No further notice need be given of the date to which the meeting is adjourned. If the vote is in the affirmative a certified copy of all proceedings relating to the proposed transaction shall be filed with the commissioner. If one of the insurance companies is a foreign company there shall be filed with the commissioner evidence of such approval, consent or other authorization as may be required by the laws of the state of incorporation of said foreign insurance company evidencing the power of the foreign insurance company to assume and carry out the agreement by which such transaction is effected. If the commissioner finds that the proceedings have been in accordance with the law and his requirements he shall approve the agreement which shall thereupon become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 979.)
-------------------------------------------

1090.

An insurer which is insolvent, retiring from business in this state other than by merger or consolidation into an admitted insurer with the commissioner’s prior written consent, or the required paid-in capital of which is impaired, shall not reinsure its business until its plan to effect such reinsurance is first submitted to the commissioner and approved by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1055.)
-------------------------------------------

1091.

The retiring insurer shall pay to the commissioner a fee of one thousand seven hundred ninety-four dollars ($1,794) for filing the documents initiating approval proceedings under this article. If the plan be approved and consummated the retiring insurer shall apply for withdrawal under Article 15 of this chapter and that fee shall also cover the services and expenses of the commissioner in connection with the withdrawal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 20.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Loans and Investments [1100. - 1107.1.]

1100.

In this state, all investments and deposits of the assets of an insurer, all purchases on behalf of an insurer, and all sales made of the property and effects of an insurer shall be made in its own name, or in that of a corporation authorized to act as a trustee under the laws of this state, or in the name of a nominee of such a corporation in accordance with any law of this state permitting such a trustee to make use of nominees, or in the name of a qualified custodian, qualified subcustodian, or qualified depository (as defined in Section 1104.9) or in the name of a nominee of a qualified custodian, qualified subcustodian, or qualified depository, provided that the nominee is not a corporation and, as to any nominee which is a partnership, the partnership shall consist solely of the employees, officers, or directors of the qualified custodian, qualified subcustodian, or qualified depository or a corporation which is a member of the same holding company system as the nominee, or any combination thereof, or in the name of a nominee approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1100.1.

Every admitted incorporated insurer may under a certificate of authority issued pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 699), engage in this state in the type of loan transactions otherwise permitted by law without obtaining any other license or certificate.

Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the State Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any obligation of, loans made by, or forbearances of, any incorporated admitted insurer.

This section creates and authorizes incorporated admitted insurers as an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 979, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.

(a) An admitted insurer’s officers, directors, trustees, and any persons who have authority in the management of the insurer’s funds, shall not, unless otherwise provided in this code:

(1) Receive any money or valuable thing for negotiating, procuring, recommending, or aiding in, any purchase by or sale to such insurer of any property, or any loan from such insurer.

(2) Be pecuniarily interested as principal, coprincipal, agent, attorney, or beneficiary, in any such purchase, sale, or loan.

(3) Directly or indirectly purchase, or be interested in the purchase of, any of the assets of the
 insurer.

(b) This section shall not apply to:

(1) The purchase or exchange of stock of an admitted insurer by an admitted insurer or between admitted insurers nor to any merger, consolidation, or corporate reorganization of such insurers, and shall not apply as to such purchase, merger, exchange, consolidation, or reorganization, nor to the officers, directors, trustees, or any persons having authority in the management of such insurers funds in respect to any such transaction, and no such transaction shall be either void or voidable, if:

(i) The transaction is just and reasonable as to the insurers involved at the time it is authorized or approved and if no such officer, director, trustee, or other person having authority in the management of such insurers funds receives any money or other valuable thing, other than
 his or her usual compensation for his or her regular duties, for negotiating, procuring, recommending, or aiding in such transaction, and, either of the following apply:

(ii) Any interest in such transaction on the part of any officers, directors, trustees, or persons who have authority in the management of any such insurer’s funds is disclosed or known to its board of directors or committee, authorizing, approving, or ratifying the transaction, and noted in the minutes thereof, and the board or committee authorizes, approves, or ratifies the transaction in good faith by a vote sufficient for the purpose without counting the vote or votes of any interested officers, directors, trustees, or persons who have authority in the management of the funds of any such insurer.

(iii) The fact of such interest is disclosed or known to the shareholders in the case of a stock insurance company,
 or in the case of a mutual insurer to the policyholders, and they approve or ratify the transaction in good faith by a vote or written consent of a majority of the shares or policyholders, as the case may be, entitled to vote, unless the consent or vote of more than a majority is otherwise required, in which event the vote or written consent shall be that so otherwise required.

Any such officer, director, trustee, or other person who has such interest may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at any meeting that authorizes, approves, or ratifies such transaction.

(2) Any transaction relating to an insurer if the transaction meets the other requirements of subdivision (b) and such officers, directors, and trustees of the insurer do not in the aggregate own more than 5 percent of the stock of any corporation with which the insurer is entering into a transaction.

(3) Any transaction if prior to its consummation the insurer has applied for and obtained from the commissioner a certificate of exemption in respect to the specific transaction therein described and such transaction is consummated in conformity with such certificate and the representations and disclosures made in, or in connection with, the application therefor.

(4) To obtain the certificate of exemption the insurer shall file with the commissioner a written application, accompanied by a filing fee of seven hundred five dollars ($705). The application shall be verified as provided in Section 834, be in a form as the commissioner shall require and shall contain all of the following:

(A) A specific description of the particular transaction for which the certificate is sought.

(B) Copies of all contracts and other legal documents involved or to be involved in the transaction.

(C) A description of all assets involved in the transaction.

(D) The names, titles, capacities, and business relationships of all persons in any way involved in the transaction who are connected with the insurer or any of its affiliates, officers, directors, managers, or controlling persons or entities in any of the capacities described in this section.

(E) A description of any and all considerations on either or any side of the transaction.

(F) Evidence that its governing board has specifically authorized the filing of the application.

(G) Such other information, opinions, or matters as the commissioner may require.

The commissioner may issue such certificate of exemption if he or she finds, with or without a hearing, that the transaction is fair, just, and equitable, and not hazardous to policyholders, stockholders, or creditors. The commissioner may impose such conditions, including, but not limited to, disclosure of the circumstances and terms of the transaction either before or after its consummation either publicly or to such persons and entities as he or she may designate and the approval of the transaction by such persons or entities as he or she may designate. He or she may also require that a report of the transaction be filed with him or her subsequent to its consummation in such form and containing such information as he or she may prescribe.

The certificate of exemption issued pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall
 only exempt the transaction from the prohibitions of this section and shall not affect the rights or remedies of any persons under any other law.

The amendment made to this section at the 1955 General Session shall not apply to contracts, sales, transfers, or other transactions entered into prior to the effective date hereof.

The commissioner shall not issue a certificate of exemption under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) in respect to any transaction consummated prior to the effective date of the amendment made to this section at the 1967 Regular Session.

(c) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any insurer, or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof, has committed or is about to commit a violation of this section, the commissioner may apply to the superior court for the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located, or if
 such insurer has no such office in this state, then to the Superior Court for the County of Los Angeles, or for the City and County of San Francisco, for an order enjoining such insurer, or such director, officer, employee, or agent thereof, from violating or continuing to violate this section, and for such other equitable relief as the nature of the case and the interests of the insurer’s policyholders, creditors, and shareholders or the public may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 21.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.1.

An officer, excluding a director who holds no other office, or employee of an admitted insurer shall not receive any money or valuable thing directly or indirectly as a brokerage commission on reinsurance ceded by such insurer and an insurer shall not pay such commissions. This provision shall not apply to brokerage or commissions authorized by the board of directors of the ceding insurer as compensation for services actually rendered nor to dividends received by any such officer or employee upon the stock of a corporation in which such officer or employee or his immediate family does not own a controlling interest or in fact exercises control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.

The financial obligation of any officer, director, trustee, or other person having authority in the management of an insurer’s funds shall not be guaranteed by such insurer in any capacity, and any such guarantee shall be void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.

Whenever an insurer is injured or made to suffer loss by reason of any violation of the provisions of sections 1101, 1102 or 1104, such insurer may recover from the guilty officer, director, trustee or other person, or any one or more of them jointly or severally damages sufficient to compensate such insurer for such loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.

An admitted insurer shall not make any loan, other than a policy loan, to any officer, director, trustee or other person having authority in the management of its funds, nor shall such officer, director, trustee or other person accept any such loan.

This section does not prohibit a loan to, or for the benefit of, an employee for the purpose of paying the premiums on a life insurance policy on the life of such employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1929.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.1.

The commissioner may from time to time require any domestic admitted insurer to report to him, in such detail as he may prescribe, the moneys and securities owned by it, the place where such moneys and securities are deposited and, in the case of moneys and securities deposited outside the State, the reason for maintaining each such deposit outside the State.

Whenever the commissioner after hearing following notice, finds that such moneys or securities are maintained on deposit outside the State in excess of legal requirements and of the reasonable needs of the business of such insurer, he may order such insurer to transfer to, and maintain in, this State money and securities to the extent of such excess and to cease, pending such transfer, from unnecessary transfers of moneys and securities from this State to any place outside this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1073.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.2.

Every person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of more than 10 percent of any class of stock of a domestic insurer or who is a director or officer of such insurer shall file in the office of the Insurance Commissioner on or before the 31st day of October, 1965, or within 10 days after he becomes such a beneficial owner, director or officer, a statement, in such form as the commissioner may prescribe, of the amount of all stock of such insurer of which he is the beneficial owner, and within 10 days after the close of each calendar month thereafter, if there has been a change in such ownership during such month, shall file in the office of the commissioner a statement, in such form as the commissioner shall prescribe, indicating his ownership at the close of the calendar month and such changes in his ownership as have occurred during such calendar month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.3.

For the purpose of preventing the unfair use of information which may have been obtained by any beneficial owner of an insurer, or director or officer thereof, described in Section 1104.2, by reason of his relationship to such insurer, any profit realized by him from any purchase and sale, or any sale and purchase, of any stock of such insurer within any period of less than six months, unless such stock was acquired in good faith in connection with a debt previously contracted, shall inure to, and be recoverable by, the insurer, irrespective of the intent of the beneficial owner, director or officer who entered into the transaction of holding the stock purchased or not repurchasing the stock sold for a period exceeding six months. Suit to recover such profit may be instituted at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction by the insurer or by the owner of any stock of the insurer in the name of and on behalf of the insurer if the insurer shall fail or refuse to bring such suit within 60 days after request or shall fail diligently to prosecute the same thereafter; but no such suit shall be brought more than two years after the date such profit was realized. This section shall not be construed to cover any transaction where a beneficial owner was not such both at the time of the purchase and sale, or the sale and purchase, of the stock involved, or any transaction or transactions which the commissioner may by rules and regulations exempt as not within the scope of this section or Section 1104.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.4.

It shall be unlawful for any beneficial owner of an insurer, or director or officer thereof, described in Section 1104.2, to, directly or indirectly, sell any stock of such insurer if he or his principal does not own the stock sold, or, if he or his principal owns the stock, he does not deliver it against such sale within 20 days thereafter, or does not within five days after such sale deposit it in the mails or other usual channels of transportation; but no person shall be deemed to have violated this section if he proves that notwithstanding the exercise of good faith he was unable to make such delivery or deposit within such time, or that to do so would cause undue inconvenience or expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.5.

The provisions of Section 1104.3 shall not apply to any purchase and sale, or sale and purchase, and the provisions of Section 1104.4 shall not apply to any sale of stock of a domestic insurer (not then or theretofore held in an investment account), by a dealer in the ordinary course of his business and incidental to the establishment or maintenance by him of a primary or secondary market (other than on an exchange as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) for such stock. The commissioner may, by such rules and regulations as he deems necessary or appropriate in the public interest, define and prescribe terms and conditions with respect to stock held in an investment account and transactions made in the ordinary course of business and incident to the establishment or maintenance of a primary or secondary market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.6.

The provisions of Sections 1104.2, 1104.3, and 1104.4 shall not apply to foreign or domestic arbitrage transactions unless made in contravention of such rules and regulations as the commissioner may adopt in order to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.7.

The term “stock” as it is used in Sections 1104.2, 1104.3, 1104.4, 1104.5 and 1104.8 means any stock or similar security, or any security, convertible, with or without consideration, into such stock or carrying any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase such stock, or any such warrant or right, or any other security which the commissioner shall deem to be of similar nature and consider necessary or appropriate, by such rules and regulations as he may prescribe in the public interest or for the protection of investors, to treat as stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.8.

The provisions of Sections 1104.2, 1104.3, and 1104.4 shall not apply to a domestic insurer if:

(a) Its stock shall be registered, or shall be required to be registered, pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended; or if

(b) Such domestic insurer shall not have any class of its stock held of record by 100 or more persons on the last business day of the year next preceding the year in which stock of the insurer would be subject to the provisions of Sections 1104.2, 1104.3, and 1104.4 except for the provisions of this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.9.

(a) (1) As used in this section, “qualified custodian” means: (A) commercial banks (as defined in Section 105 of the Financial Code), savings and loan associations (as defined in Section 5102 of the Financial Code), and trust companies (other than trust departments of title insurance companies), or any entity approved by the commissioner as a qualified custodian; (B) that is either (i) domiciled and has a principal place of business in this state or (ii) a national banking association with a trust office located in this state; and (C) that either has a net worth of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) or is able to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner that it is financially secure. The commissioner may consider, among other factors, evidence of the following in order to
 determine whether a custodian is financially secure for the purpose of this subdivision: (i) its obligations under an agreement approved by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (c) are guaranteed by its parent holding company, (ii) its parent holding company has a net worth of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or (iii) it is a member of a holding company system with a net worth of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

(2) (A) As used in this section, “qualified depository” means an entity that is located in this state or a reciprocal state and is (i) a depository that provides for the long-term immobilization of securities or a clearing corporation that is also a depository, and that in either case has been approved by or registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, (ii) a Federal Reserve bank, or (iii) an entity approved by the commissioner as a qualified
 depository.

(B) A “qualified depository” may also include an entity that is located outside the United States, if it is a securities depository and clearing agency, incorporated or organized under the laws of a country other than the United States, (i) that operates a transnational system for securities or equivalent book entries (specifically Euroclear and Cedel, or successors to all or substantially all of their operations), or (ii) that operates a central system for securities or equivalent book entries, but solely for securities issued by, or by entities within, the country in which the securities depository and clearing agency is incorporated or organized. The depository shall meet all qualifying requirements imposed by this section upon Euroclear or Cedel.

(3) As used in this section, “qualified subcustodian” means an entity located in this state or a reciprocal state (A)
 that holds securities of the domestic insurer, and maintains an account through which the securities are held, in this state or a reciprocal state and (B) that has shareholder equity of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) or is able to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner that it is financially secure. The qualified subcustodian shall be: (A) a commercial bank, a savings and loan association, or a trust company (other than trust departments of title insurance companies); (B) a subsidiary of a qualified custodian; or (C) any entity approved by the commissioner as a qualified subcustodian. The commissioner may consider, among other factors, evidence of the following in order to determine whether a subcustodian is financially secure for the purpose of this subdivision: (i) its obligations are guaranteed by its parent company, (ii) its parent holding company has shareholder equity of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or (iii) it is a member of a holding company
 system with shareholder equity of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). A “qualified subcustodian” may also include an entity that is located outside the United States that is used by the domestic insurer for the purpose of obtaining access to a qualified depository located outside the United States. The qualified foreign subcustodian shall be a banking institution or trust company, incorporated or organized under the laws of a country other than the United States, that is regulated by that country’s government or an agency thereof, and that has shareholders’ equity in excess of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000), whether in United States dollars or the equivalent of United States dollars, as of the close of its most recently completed fiscal year; or a majority-owned direct or indirect subsidiary of a qualified United States bank or bank holding company, if the subsidiary is incorporated or organized under the laws of a country other than the United States and has shareholders’ equity